Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Group and Blanket Health Insurance.

Administrative Code. —

For group health insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 6.

Sec. 21.54.010.
Required provisions of group policies.

Each group health insurance policy must contain in substance the following provisions:

a provision that, in the absence of fraud, all statements made by applicants or the policyholder or by an insured person shall be considered representations and not warranties, and that a statement made for the purpose of effecting insurance may not void the insurance or reduce benefits unless contained in a written instrument signed by the policyholder or the insured person, a copy of which has been furnished to the policyholder or to the insured person or the beneficiary of the insured person;

a provision that the insurer will furnish to the policyholder for delivery to each employee or member of the insured group, a statement in summary form of the essential features of the insurance coverage of the employee or member and to whom benefits are payable; if dependents are included in the coverage, only one certificate need be issued for each family unit;

a provision that to the group originally insured may be added from time to time eligible new employees or members or dependents, as the case may be, in accordance with the terms of the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 68 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.54.015.
Rate requirements; filings; regulations; health care insurance restrictions.

Rates charged for a group health insurance policy may not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory.

A health care insurer may decline to cover or may restrict the coverage offered to a self-employed individual under an association plan authorized under AS

21.54.060(a)(6)

.

Except for large employer health care insurance plan premium rates exempted by the director by regulation under (d) of this section, an insurer shall file with the director the premium rates charged for each health care insurance plan before using them. A premium rate or premium rate change must be on file with the director for a waiting period of at least 45 days before the effective date of the premium rate. That period may be extended by the director or the insurer for an additional 15 days if, during the initial 45-day waiting period, notice is given stating that additional time for consideration of the filing is needed. A filing may become effective at the end of the waiting period unless disapproved by the director during the waiting period. If an insurer fails to provide information requested by the director during the waiting period, the filing is considered withdrawn by the insurer, and the premium rate does not become effective.

The director shall adopt regulations

establishing procedures for the filing and use of rates; and

specifying information that must be submitted in a filing required under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 58 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 2004; am § 77 ch 23 SLA 2011; am § 48 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent statement applicable to the enactment of subsection (b) by § 2, ch. 54, SLA 2004, see § 1, ch. 54, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (b), substituted “AS

21.54.060(a)(6)

” for “AS

21.54.060

(7)”.

Sec. 21.54.020.
Direct payment to providers.

On the written request of a covered person, a health care insurer shall pay amounts due under a health insurance policy directly to the provider of medical care services. A health insurance policy may not contain a provision that requires services be provided by a particular hospital or person, except as applicable to a health maintenance organization under AS 21.86. If a health care insurer makes a claim payment to the covered person after the covered person has given written notice electing direct payment to the provider of the service, the health care insurer shall also pay that amount to the provider of the service.

A covered person may revoke an election of direct claim payment made under (a) of this section by giving written notice of the revocation to the health care insurer and to the provider of the service. The written notice of revocation to the health care insurer must certify that the covered person has given written notice of revocation to the provider of the service. Revocation of direct claim payment is not effective until the later of the date the health care insurer received the notice of revocation or the date the provider of the service received the revocation.

The right of the covered person to request payment of indemnities under a blanket health insurance policy directly to the provider of the services or to another person may be transferred by a qualified domestic relations order to a person who is not the covered person. Rights under the qualified domestic relations order do not take effect until the order is received by the health care insurer. In this subsection, “qualified domestic relations order” means an order or judgment in a divorce or dissolution action under AS 25.24 that designates a person to determine to whom indemnities for a covered person should be paid under a health insurance policy.

This section does not prohibit a health care insurer from recovering an amount mistakenly paid to a provider or a covered person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 133 SLA 1990; am §§ 69, 70 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 2001; am § 38 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 78 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 133, SLA 1990 provides that the 1990 amendments to this section apply “to policies of disability insurance entered into or renewed after September 12, 1990.”

Sec. 21.54.030.
Required provisions of blanket policies.

An insurer authorized to write health insurance in this state shall have the power to issue blanket health insurance. A blanket policy may not be issued or delivered in this state unless a copy of the form of the policy has been filed in accordance with AS

21.42.120

. Each blanket policy must contain provisions that in the opinion of the director are at least as favorable to the policyholder and the individual insured as the following:

a provision that the policy, including endorsements and a copy of the application, if any, of the policyholder and the persons insured shall constitute the entire contract between the parties, and that any statement made by the policyholder or by a person insured shall in the absence of fraud be considered a representation and not a warranty, and that a statement may not be used in defense to a claim under the policy, unless contained in a written application; the person, a beneficiary, or assignee, shall have the right to make written request to the insurer for a copy of the application and the insurer shall, within 15 days after the receipt of the request at its home office or a branch office of the insurer, deliver or mail to the person making the request a copy of the application;

a provision that written notice of sickness or of injury must be given to the insurer within 20 days after the date when the sickness or injury occurred; failure to give notice within that time may not invalidate or reduce a claim if it is shown that it was not reasonably possible to give the notice and that notice was given as soon as was reasonably possible;

a provision that the insurer will furnish to the policyholder the forms that are usually furnished by it for filing proof of loss; if the forms are not furnished before the expiration of 15 days after the giving of the notice, the claimant shall be considered to have complied with the requirements of the policy as to proof of loss upon submitting, within the time fixed in the policy for filing proof of loss, written proof covering the occurrence, character, and extent of the loss for which claim is made;

a provision that in the case of claim for loss of time for disability, written proof of the loss must be furnished to the insurer within 90 days after the beginning of the period for which the insurer is liable, and that subsequent written proofs of the continuance of the disability must be furnished to the insurer at the intervals that the insurer may reasonably require, and that in the case of claim for any other loss, written proof of the loss must be furnished to the insurer within 90 days after the date of the loss; failure to furnish the proof within that time does not invalidate or reduce a claim if it is shown that it was not reasonably possible to furnish the proof and that the proof was furnished as soon as was reasonably possible;

a provision that all benefits payable under the policy other than benefits for loss of time will be payable immediately upon receipt of written proof of the loss, and that, subject to proof of loss, all accrued benefits payable under the policy for loss of time will be paid not later than at the expiration of each period of 30 days during the continuance of the period for which the insurer is liable, and that any balance remaining unpaid at the termination of the period will be paid immediately upon receipt of the proof;

a provision that the insurer at its own expense shall have the right and opportunity to examine the person of the insured when and so often as it may reasonably require during the pendency of claim under the policy and also the right and opportunity to make an autopsy in case of death if it is not prohibited by law;

a provision that a civil action may not be brought to recover under the policy before the expiration of 60 days after written proof of loss has been furnished in accordance with the requirements of the policy and that an action may not be brought after the expiration of three years after the time written proof of loss is required to be furnished.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 71 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.54.040.
Application and certificates not required.

An individual application may not be required from a person covered under a blanket health insurance policy or contract, nor is it necessary for the insurer to furnish each person a certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 72 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.54.050.
Payment of blanket health policy benefits.

All benefits under a blanket health insurance policy shall be paid to (1) the person insured; (2) the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries of the person insured; (3) the estate of the person insured; (4) the parent, guardian, or other person actually supporting the person insured, if the person insured is a minor or otherwise not competent to give a valid release; or (5) the employer, if the entire cost of the insurance has been paid by the employer. An insurer may, and upon written request of the covered person shall, within 30 working days after receiving a proof of loss statement, pay benefits directly to the provider of the hospital, nursing, medical, dental, or surgical services. The policy may not contain a provision requiring that services be provided by a particular hospital or person, except as applicable to a health maintenance organization under AS 21.86. If the insurer pays indemnities to the insured after the covered person has given the insurer written notice in the proof of loss statement of an election of direct payment of indemnities to the provider of the service, the insurer shall also pay those indemnities to the provider of the service.

A covered person may revoke an election of direct payment of benefits made under (a) of this section by giving written notice of the revocation to the insurer and to the provider of the services. The written notice of revocation given to the insurer must certify that the covered person has given written notice of revocation to the provider of the services. Revocation of an election of direct payment is not effective until the notice of revocation is received by the insurer and the provider of the services.

The right of the covered person to request payment of indemnities under a group health insurance policy directly to the provider of the services or to another person may be transferred to a person who is not the covered person by a qualified domestic relations order. Rights under the qualified domestic relations order do not take effect until the order is received by the insurer. In this subsection, “qualified domestic relations order” means an order or judgment in a divorce or dissolution action under AS 25.24 that designates a person to determine to whom indemnities for a covered person should be paid under a health insurance policy.

This section does not prohibit an insurer from recovering an indemnity mistakenly paid to a provider or a covered person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 133 SLA 1990; am §§ 73, 74 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 133, SLA 1990 provides that the 1990 amendments to this section apply “to policies of disability insurance entered into or renewed after September 12, 1990.”

Sec. 21.54.060.
Group health insurance defined.

Group health insurance is that form of health insurance covering groups of persons as defined below, with or without one or more members of their families or one or more of their dependents, or covering one or more members of the families or one or more dependents of the groups of persons and issued on the following basis:

under a policy issued to an employer or trustees of a fund established by an employer, who shall be considered the policyholder, insuring employees of the employer for the benefit of persons other than the employer; in this paragraph the term “employees” includes the officers, managers, and employees of the employer, the individual proprietor or partner if the employer is an individual proprietor or partnership, the officers, managers, and employees of subsidiary or affiliated corporations, the individual proprietors, partners, and employees of individuals and firms if the business of the employer and the individual or firm is under common control through stock ownership, contract, or otherwise; in this paragraph, “employees” may include retired employees; a policy issued to insure employees of a public body may provide that the term “employees” includes elected or appointed officials; the policy may provide that the term “employees” includes the trustees or their employees, or both, if their duties are principally connected with the trusteeship; a policy issued to insure employees of a corporation may provide that the term “employees” includes directors of the corporation, whether or not the directors receive compensation;

under a policy issued to an association, including a labor union, that is a bona fide association that has a constitution and bylaws and that insures members, employees, or employees of members of the association for the benefit of persons other than the association or its officers or trustees; in this paragraph, the term “employees” may include retired employees;

under a policy issued to the trustees of a fund established, adopted, or participated in by two or more employers or by one or more labor unions or by one or more employers and one or more labor unions or by an association as defined in (2) of this section, which trustees shall be considered the policyholder, to insure employees of the employers or members of the unions or of the association, or employees of members of the association, for the benefit of persons other than the employers or the unions or the association; in this paragraph, the term “employees” may include the officers, managers, and employees of the employer, and the individual proprietor or partners if the employer is an individual proprietor or partnership; in this paragraph, the term “employees” may include retired employees; the policy may provide that the term “employees” includes the trustees or their employees, or both, if their duties are principally connected with the trusteeship;

under a policy issued to a person or organization to which a policy of group life insurance may be issued or delivered in this state to insure a class or classes of individuals that could be insured under the group life policy;

a group health insurance policy that contains provisions for the payment by the insurer of benefits for expenses incurred on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services for members of the family or dependents of a person in the insured group may provide for the continuation of the benefit provisions, or a part or parts of them, after the death of the person in the insured group;

under a policy issued to an association of employers covering the employees and dependents of the employees, or issued to an association of self- employed individuals covering self-employed individuals and dependents of the self- employed individuals, or issued to an association that includes a combination of employers and self-employed individuals; for purposes of this paragraph,

an association described under this paragraph shall comply with the following requirements:

the association shall have a constitution and bylaws;

the association shall be maintained in good faith for the benefit of persons other than the association or its officers or trustees;

membership in the association shall be restricted to large or small employers, or self-employed individuals, who are residents of the state; however, an employer domiciled in another state may become a member of the association for purposes of obtaining coverage through the association only for the employees and dependents of the employees of that employer who are residents of this state;

except as provided under AS

21.54.015

, the association may not condition membership in the association or coverage under a health insurance policy issued to the association on any of the factors listed under AS

21.54.100(a)

;

“self-employed individual” means an individual who derives a substantial portion of the individual’s income from a trade or business through which the individual has attempted to earn taxable income and for which the individual has filed the appropriate Internal Revenue Service form and schedule for the previous taxable year.

An insurer may issue a group health insurance policy to a group that does not meet one or more of the requirements under (a)(1) — (4) and (6) of this section on a finding by the director that issuance of a group policy to the group

is in the best interests of the public;

results in economies of acquisition or administration; and

meets other requirements adopted by the director by regulation.

An insurer must submit to the director information satisfactory to the director that the group meets the requirements of (b) of this section and the director must affirmatively approve of the group before an insurer may issue a group health insurance policy under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1978; am § 75 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 54 SLA 2004; am §§ 49, 50 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, in paragraph (3), “(2) of this section” was substituted for “(a)(2) of this section” to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For group health insurance, see 3 AAC 28, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a)(2), inserted “is a bona fide association that” following “labor union”; substituted “insures” for “has been organized and is maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance, insuring”, in (a)(3), inserted “, adopted, or participated in” following “established”; deleted ”in the same or related industry” following “more employers”, deleted (a)(5), and made related changes; added (b) and (c).

Sec. 21.54.070.
Blanket health insurance defined.

Blanket health insurance is declared to be that form of health insurance covering groups of persons as enumerated in one of the following subdivisions:

under a policy or contract issued to a common carrier or to an operator, owner, or lessee of a means of transportation, who or which shall be considered the policyholder, covering a group of persons who may become passengers defined by reference to their travel status on the common carrier or the means of transportation;

under a policy or contract issued to an employer, who shall be considered the policyholder, covering a group of employees, dependents, or guests, defined by reference to specified hazards incident to an activity or activities or operations of the policyholder;

under a policy or contract issued to a college, school, or other institution of learning, a school district or districts, or school jurisdictional unit, or to the head, principal, or governing board of an educational unit, who or which shall be considered the policyholder covering students, teachers, or employees;

under a policy or contract issued to a religious, charitable, recreational, educational, or civic organization, or branch of them, which shall be considered the policyholder, covering a group of members or participants defined by reference to specified hazards incident to an activity or activities or operations sponsored or supervised by the policyholder;

under a policy or contract issued to a sports team, camp, or sponsor of them, which shall be considered the policyholder, covering members, campers, employees, officials, or supervisors;

under a policy or contract issued to a volunteer fire department, first aid, civil defense, or other volunteer organization, which shall be considered the policyholder, covering a group of members or participants defined by reference to specified hazards incident to an activity or activities or operations sponsored or supervised by the policyholder;

under a policy or contract issued to a newspaper or other publisher, which shall be considered the policyholder, covering its carriers;

under a policy or contract issued to an association, including a labor union, that has a constitution and bylaws and that has been organized and is maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance, which shall be considered the policyholder, covering a group of members or participants defined by reference to specified hazards incident to an activity or activities or operations sponsored or supervised by the policyholder;

under a policy or contract issued to cover any other risk or class of risks that, in the discretion of the director, may be properly eligible for blanket accident and sickness insurance; the discretion of the director may be exercised on an individual risk basis or class of risks, or both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 76 ch 56 SLA 1996)